Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB970.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3211 of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3211. Well permits.* * *(a.1) Oil and gas fluid injection wells prohibited.--(1) No person shall drill or alter a well to inject fluids produced in association with oil and gas production for disposal or storage.(2) The department may not issue a well permit for a proposed drilling or alteration of a well to inject fluids produced in association with oil and gas production for disposal or storage.(3) A person who meets the following may bring an action in a court of common pleas to enforce compliance with 123456789101112131415161718 paragraph (1):(i) resides or owns property within five miles of a well drilled or altered in violation of paragraph (1); or(ii) owns or operates a business that conducts business activities within five miles of a well drilled or altered in violation of paragraph (1).(4) An action under this subsection must be brought in the court of common pleas in the district where the well is located.(5) In an action brought under this subsection, the court of common pleas may grant appropriate relief, i ncluding actual damages, attorney fees and court costs and equitable and injunctive relief.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0970PN1111 - 2 - 123456789101112131415